test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/V-TA-kiskiswew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - kîskiswêw - cut him/her through : # VTA-Cw verb - Wolvengrey p. 407; Fut+Cond from Okimāsis pp. 87-88, 110
  
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: nikîskiswâw # SET I
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kikîskiswâw
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: nikîskiswânân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kikîskiswânaw
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kikîskiswâwâw
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: nikîskiswâwak # SET I-Pl
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kikîskiswâwak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: nikîskiswânânak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kikîskiswânawak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kikîskiswâwâwak
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kikîskison # SET II
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kikîskisonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kikîskisonâwâw
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: kîskiswêw # SET III
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskiswêwak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: kîskiswêyiwa
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: kîskisomêw # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: kîskisomêwak # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: nikîskisomâwa # SET IV
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kikîskisomâwa
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: nikîskisomânâna
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kikîskisomânawa
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kikîskisomâwâwa
     
     
     
     
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3SgO: [nikî-kîskiswâw, nikîkîskiswâw] # SET I (past)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3SgO: [kikî-kîskiswâw, nikîkîskiswâw]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3SgO: [nikî-kîskiswânân, nikîkîskiswânân]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3SgO: [kikî-kîskiswânaw, nikîkîskiswânaw]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3SgO: [kikî-kîskiswâwâw, nikîkîskiswâwâw]
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+3PlO: [nikî-kîskiswâwak, nikîkîskiswâwak] # SET I-Pl (past)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+3PlO: [kikî-kîskiswâwak, nikîkîskiswâwak]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+3PlO: [nikî-kîskiswânânak, nikîkîskiswânânak]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+3PlO: [kikî-kîskiswânawak, nikîkîskiswânawak]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+3PlO: [kikî-kîskiswâwâwak, nikîkîskiswâwâwak]
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+1SgO: [kikî-kîskison, nikîkîskison] # SET II (past)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kikî-kîskisonân, nikîkîskisonân]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+1SgO: [kikî-kîskisonâwâw, nikîkîskisonâwâw]
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kî-kîskiswêw, kîkîskiswêw] # SET III (past)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kî-kîskiswêwak, kîkîskiswêwak]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-kîskiswêyiwa, kîkîskiswêyiwa]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [kî-kîskisomêw, kîkîskisomêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [kî-kîskisomêwak, kîkîskisomêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-kîskisomâwa, nikîkîskisomâwa] # SET IV (past)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-kîskisomâwa, nikîkîskisomâwa]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nikî-kîskisomânâna, nikîkîskisomânâna]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-kîskisomânawa, nikîkîskisomânawa]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prt+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kikî-kîskisomâwâwa, nikîkîskisomâwâwa]
     
     
     
     
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3SgO: [nika-kîskiswâw, nikakîskiswâw] # SET I (Fut+Def)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3SgO: [kika-kîskiswâw, kikakîskiswâw]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3SgO: [nika-kîskiswânân, nikakîskiswânân]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3SgO: [kika-kîskiswânaw, kikakîskiswânaw]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3SgO: [kika-kîskiswâwâw, kikakîskiswâwâw]
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+3PlO: [nika-kîskiswâwak, nikakîskiswâwak] # SET I-Pl (Fut+Def)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+3PlO: [kika-kîskiswâwak, kikakîskiswâwak]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+3PlO: [nika-kîskiswânânak, nikakîskiswânânak]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+3PlO: [kika-kîskiswânawak, kikakîskiswânawak]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+3PlO: [kika-kîskiswâwâwak, kikakîskiswâwâwak]
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+1SgO: [kika-kîskison, kikakîskison] # SET II (Fut+Def)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [kika-kîskisonân, kikakîskisonân]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+1SgO: [kika-kîskisonâwâw, kikakîskisonâwâw]
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ka-kîskiswêw, kakîskiswêw] # SET III (Fut+Def)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ka-kîskiswêwak, kakîskiswêwak]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-kîskiswêyiwa, kakîskiswêyiwa]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ka-kîskisomêw, kakîskisomêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ka-kîskisomêwak, kakîskisomêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [nika-kîskisomâwa, nikakîskisomâwa] # SET IV (Fut+Def)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kika-kîskisomâwa, kikakîskisomâwa]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [nika-kîskisomânâna, nikakîskisomânâna]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-kîskisomânawa, kikakîskisomânawa]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kika-kîskisomâwâwa, kikakîskisomâwâwa]
     
     
     


     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: nikîskisok  # SET I inv
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kikîskisok
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: nikîskisokonân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kikîskisokonaw
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kikîskisokowâw
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: nikîskisokwak # SET I-Pl inv
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kikîskisokwak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: nikîskisokonânak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kikîskisokonawak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kikîskisokowâwak
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kikîskisotin # SET II inv
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: kikîskisotinân
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kikîskisotinâwâw
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: kîskisok # SET III inv (no 5-3 according to Wolvengrey)
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: kîskisokwak
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisokoyiwa
          
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: nikîskisokoyiwa # SET IV inv
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kikîskisokoyiwa
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: nikîskisokonâna
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kikîskisokonawa
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kikîskisokowâwa
     




     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: kîskiswak # SET I
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kîskiswat
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâyâhk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâyahk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kîskiswâyêk
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: kîskiswakik # SET I-Pl
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kîskiswacik
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâyâhkik
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâyahkok
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kîskiswâyêkok
      
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kîskisoyan # SET II
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kîskisoyâhk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kîskisoyêk
         
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: kîskiswât # SET III
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskiswâcik
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: kîskisomât
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: kîskisomâcik
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: kîskiswâyit
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomak # SET IV
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomat
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomâyâhk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomâyahk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisomâyek



     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: kîskisot # SET I inv
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kîskisosk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: kîskisokoyâhk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kîskisokoyahk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kîskisokoyêk
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: kîskisocik # SET I-Pl inv
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kîskisoskik
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: kîskisokoyâhkik
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kîskisokoyahkok
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kîskisokoyêkok
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kîskisotân # SET II inv
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: kîskisotâhk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kîskisotakok
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: kîskisokot # SET III inv
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: kîskisokocik
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: kîskisokoyit
     
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: kîskisomit # SET IV inv
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kîskisomisk
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: kîskisokoyâhk, kîskisokowâyâhk]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [kîskisokoyêk, kîskisokowâyêk]
     kîskiswêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [kîskisokoyahk, kîskisokowâyahk]
